Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
330

POISONS,
SALE OF

Section

330-1 Definition of poison

330-2 Rules concerning poisons

330-3 Penalty for violations

330-4 to 7 Repealed

330-8 Use of certain chemical substances as
inhalants

unlawful

330-9 Penalty

330-10 Penalty

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next